Utah statutes.
53A-1-201.   Election and appointment of officers -- Removal from office.
(1)  The State Board of Education shall elect from its members a chair and
vice chair each year at a meeting held any time between November 15 and
January 15.
(2) (a)  If the election of officers is held subsequent to the election of a
new member of the board, but prior to the time that the new member takes
office, the new member shall assume the position of the outgoing member for
purposes of the election of officers.
(b)  In all other matters the outgoing member shall retain the full authority
of the office until replaced as provided by law.
(3)  The duties of these officers shall be determined by the board.
(4)  The board shall appoint a secretary who serves at the pleasure of the
board.
(5)  An officer appointed or elected by the board under this section may be
removed from office for cause by a vote of two-thirds of the board.
